District of Columbia statutes.
47-2322

Severability; savings clauses.

(a)

If any provision of § 47-2005 or this subchapter, or both, including any amendment made by § 47-2005 or this subchapter, or both, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the provisions of § 47-2005 or this subchapter, or both, including the remaining amendments thereof, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(b)

The repeal or amendment by § 47-2005 or this subchapter, or both, or any provision of law shall not affect any act done or any right accrued or accruing under such provision of law before March 4, 1981, or both, or any suit or proceeding had or commenced before March 4, 1981, or both, but all such rights and liabilities under this subchapter and § 47-2005 shall continue, and may be enforced in the same manner and the same extent, as if such repeal or amendment had not been made.

(c)

All offenses committed, and all penalties incurred, prior to March 4, 1981, or both, under any provision of law repealed or amended, may be prosecuted and punished in the same manner and with the same effect as if § 47-2005 and this subchapter, or both, had not been enacted.

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-128, § 14, 28 DCR 246
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(o), 46 DCR 2118

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2322.

Prior Codifications